Florida, session 2026, SB526.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 70 71 Section 1.âSection 255.0994, Florida Statutes, is created 72 to read: 73 255.0994âPublic works projects; unenforceability of certain 74 contract provisions regarding delays.â 75 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 76 (a)ââConcurrent delaysâ means two or more unrelated delays 77 in the contractorâs performance of a contract for a public works 78 project which happen at the same time or overlap in time, each 79 of which on its own would have delayed the contractorâs 80 performance. 81 (b)ââGovernmental entityâ has the same meaning as in s. 82 255.0993(1). 83 (c)ââPublic works projectâ has the same meaning as in s. 84 255.0992(1). 85 (2)âExcept as otherwise required by federal or state law, a 86 governmental entity that contracts for a public works project 87 may not take any of the following actions: 88 (a)âEnforce any contract provisions that would eliminate or 89 limit the contractorâs right to receive compensation for damages 90 and increased costs, equitable adjustments, or time extensions 91 due to a delay in performance of the contract, either on its own 92 behalf or on behalf of a subcontractor or supplier, to the 93 extent the delay was caused in whole or in part by the acts or 94 omissions of the governmental entity or of any agent, employee, 95 or person acting on its behalf. 96 (b)âEnforce any contract provisions that would eliminate or 97 limit the contractorâs right to receive time extensions due to 98 concurrent delays, either on its own behalf or on behalf of a 99 subcontractor or supplier, if at least one of those delays was 100 caused in whole or in part by the acts or omissions of the 101 governmental entity or of any agent, employee, or person acting 102 on its behalf. 103 (3)âThis section may not be construed to render 104 unenforceable a provision of a contract for a public works 105 project which: 106 (a)âRequires the party claiming a delay to give notice of 107 the acts or omissions giving rise to the delay; 108 (b)âAllows a governmental entity to recover liquidated 109 damages for a delay if it was caused by the acts or omissions of 110 the contractor or its subcontractors, agents, or employees; or 111 (c)âProvides for arbitration or any other procedure 112 designed to settle contract disputes. 113 (4)âIf a contract for a public works project contains a 114 provision that is unenforceable under this section, the 115 provision must be severed from the contract, and the remaining 116 provisions must remain in full force and effect. 117 (5)âThis section applies to any contract for a public works 118 project entered into on or after July 1, 2026. 119 Section 2.âPresent subsections (1) through (12) of section 120 553.71, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (2) 121 through (13), respectively, and a new subsection (1) is added to 122 that section, to read: 123 553.71âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 124 (1)ââCommercial construction projectâ means the 125 construction, alteration, or repair of a building or structure 126 that is primarily intended for business, industrial, 127 institutional, or mercantile use and is not classified as 128 residential under the Florida Building Code. 129 Section 3.âSection 553.789, Florida Statutes, is created to 130 read: 131 553.789âUniform commercial building permit application.â 132 (1)âBy December 31, 2026, the commission shall adopt rules 133 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 which establish uniform 134 commercial building permit acceptance standards that identify 135 the information required for acceptance of a commercial building 136 permit application. The standards must be used statewide by all 137 enforcement agencies. The standards must include, at a minimum, 138 all of the following information: 139 (a)âThe name and contact information of the property owner. 140 (b)âThe name, license number, and contact information of 141 the contractor, if known at the time of the application. 142 (c)âThe address and parcel identification number of the 143 construction project. 144 (d)âThe project type and occupancy classification under the 145 Florida Building Code. 146 (e)âA description of the construction project, including 147 whether the project is new construction or an alteration, an 148 addition, or a repair. 149 (f)âThe total square footage and the declared value of the 150 construction project. 151 (g)âThe architect or engineer of record, if applicable. 152 (h)âThe identification of any private provider services if 153 used pursuant to s. 553.791. 154 (2)âThe commission shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 155 120.536(1) and 120.54 which create additional trade-specific 156 acceptance standards for trades that are often present on a 157 commercial construction project, including, but not limited to, 158 electric, HVAC, plumbing, and water and sewer. 159 (3)âAn enforcement agency must accept a completed 160 application if it provides the information set forth in the 161 uniform commercial building permit acceptance standards and any 162 other trade-specific acceptance standards that may be adopted by 163 the commission. However, an enforcement agency may require 164 submission of additional documentation or plans reasonably 165 necessary for the applicant to demonstrate compliance with the 166 Florida Building Code or applicable local ordinances and land 167 development code. 168 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) and paragraph 169 (a) of subsection (24) of section 553.79, Florida Statutes, are 170 amended, and paragraph (g) is added to subsection (1) of that 171 section, to read: 172 553.79âPermits; applications; issuance; inspections.â 173 (1) 174 (g)âPermit fees imposed by a local enforcement agency must 175 be limited to the actual and reasonable costs incurred in 176 reviewing, processing, and administering the permit and may not 177 be based on industry standards, market rates, or comparable 178 retail pricing. Such fees must be proportional to the work 179 performed in reviewing, processing, and administering the 180 permit. 181 (5)(a)âDuring new construction or during repair or 182 restoration projects in which the structural system or 183 structural loading of a building is being modified, the 184 enforcing agency shall require a special inspector to perform 185 structural inspections on a threshold building pursuant to a 186 structural inspection plan prepared by the engineer or architect 187 of record. The structural inspection plan must be submitted to 188 and approved by the enforcing agency before the issuance of a 189 building permit for the construction of a threshold building. 190 The purpose of the structural inspection plan is to provide 191 specific inspection procedures and schedules so that the 192 building can be adequately inspected for compliance with the 193 permitted documents. The special inspector may not serve as a 194 surrogate in carrying out the responsibilities of the building 195 official, the architect, or the engineer of record. The 196 contractorâs contractual or statutory obligations are not 197 relieved by any action of the special inspector. The special 198 inspector shall determine that a professional engineer who 199 specializes in shoring design has inspected the shoring and 200 reshoring for conformance with the shoring and reshoring plans 201 submitted to the enforcing agency. A fee simple title owner of a 202 building, which does not meet the minimum size, height, 203 occupancy, occupancy classification, or number-of-stories 204 criteria which would result in classification as a threshold 205 building as defined in s. 553.71 under s. 553.71(12), may 206 designate such building as a threshold building, subject to more 207 than the minimum number of inspections required by the Florida 208 Building Code. 209 (24)(a)âA political subdivision of this state may not adopt 210 or enforce any ordinance or impose any building permit or other 211 development order requirement that: 212 1.âContains any building, construction, or aesthetic 213 requirement or condition that conflicts with or impairs 214 corporate trademarks, service marks, trade dress, logos, color 215 patterns, design scheme insignia, image standards, or other 216 features of corporate branding identity on real property or 217 improvements thereon used in activities conducted under chapter 218 526 or in carrying out business activities defined as a 219 franchise by Federal Trade Commission regulations in 16 C.F.R. 220 ss. 436.1, et. seq.; or 221 2.âImposes any requirement on the design, construction, or 222 location of signage advertising the retail price of gasoline in 223 accordance with the requirements of ss. 526.111 and 526.121 224 which prevents the signage from being clearly visible and 225 legible to drivers of approaching motor vehicles from a vantage 226 point on any lane of traffic in either direction on a roadway 227 abutting the gas station premises and meets height, width, and 228 spacing standards for Series C, D, or E signs, as applicable, 229 published in the latest edition of Standard Alphabets for 230 Highway Signs published by the United States Department of 231 Commerce, Bureau of Public Roads, Office of Highway Safety; or 232 3.âImposes a glazing requirement that results in the 233 glazing of more than 15 percent of the surface area of the 234 primary facade for the first 10 feet above the ground floor for 235 a proposed new commercial or mixed-use construction or 236 restoration project. Such glazing requirements may not be 237 imposed or enforced on any facade other than the primary facade, 238 and such glazing requirements may not be imposed or enforced on 239 any portion of the primary facade higher than the first 10 feet 240 above the ground floor. For purposes of this subparagraph, the 241 term: 242 a.ââGlazingâ means the installation of transparent or 243 translucent materials, including glass or similar substances, in 244 windows, doors, or storefronts. The term includes any actual or 245 faux windows to be installed to a building facade. 246 b.ââPrimary facadeâ means the single building side housing 247 the primary entrance to the building. 248 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 249 553.791, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (d) is 250 added to that subsection, to read: 251 553.791âAlternative plans review and inspection.â 252 (2) 253 (b)âIf an owner or contractor retains a private provider 254 for purposes of plans review or building inspection services, 255 the local jurisdiction must reduce the permit fee by the amount 256 of cost savings realized by the local enforcement agency for not 257 having to perform such services. Such reduction may be 258 calculated on a flat fee or percentage basis, or any other 259 reasonable means by which a local enforcement agency assesses 260 the cost for its plans review or inspection services. The local 261 jurisdiction shall include the applicable reduction in the 262 permit fee on its schedule of fees which is posted on its 263 website. The local jurisdiction may not charge fees for building 264 inspections or plans review services if the fee owner or 265 contractor hires a private provider to perform such services; 266 however, the local jurisdiction may charge a reasonable 267 administrative fee, which shall be based on the cost that is 268 actually incurred, including the labor cost of the personnel 269 providing the service, by the local jurisdiction or attributable 270 to the local jurisdiction for the clerical and supervisory 271 assistance required, or both. The local jurisdiction shall 272 specify the services covered by the administrative fees on its 273 website. 274 (d)âIf an owner or a contractor retains a private provider 275 for purposes of plans review or building inspection services for 276 a commercial construction project, the local enforcement agency 277 must reduce the permit fee by at least 25 percent of the portion 278 of the permit fee attributable to plans review or building 279 inspection services, as applicable. If an owner or a contractor 280 retains a private provider for all required plans review and 281 building inspection services, the local enforcement agency must 282 reduce the total permit fee by at least 50 percent of the amount 283 otherwise charged for such services. If a local enforcement 284 agency does not reduce its fees by at least the percentages 285 provided in this paragraph, the local enforcement agency 286 forfeits the ability to collect any fees for the commercial 287 construction project. The surcharge required by s. 553.721 must 288 be calculated based on the reduced permit fee. This paragraph 289 does not prohibit a local enforcement agency from reducing its 290 fees in excess of the percentages provided in this paragraph. 291 Section 6.âSection 553.8411, Florida Statutes, is created 292 to read: 293 553.8411âNonresidential buildings; floodproofing.âA 294 nonresidential structure constructed after July 1, 2026, which 295 is located in a flood zone as designated by the Federal 296 Emergency Management Agency must elevate its lowest floor above 297 the required design flood elevation. As an alternative to this 298 requirement, a nonresidential structure may be designed and 299 constructed below the required design flood elevation if all 300 structural areas below the required design flood elevation are 301 substantially impermeable to water and capable of resisting the 302 effects of the regulatory floodplain, including, but not limited 303 to, flow velocities, duration, rate of rise, hydrostatic and 304 hydrodynamic forces, buoyancy, and debris impact. 305 Section 7.âSubsection (5) of section 553.842, Florida 306 Statutes, is amended to read: 307 553.842âProduct evaluation and approval.â 308 (5)âStatewide approval of products, methods, or systems of 309 construction may be achieved by one of the following methods. 310 One of these methods must be used by the commission to approve 311 the following categories of products: panel walls, exterior 312 doors, roofing, skylights, windows, shutters, impact protective 313 systems, mitigation products, and structural components as 314 established by the commission by rule. A product may not be 315 advertised, sold, offered, provided, distributed, or marketed as 316 hurricane, windstorm, or impact protection from wind-borne 317 debris from a hurricane or windstorm unless it is approved 318 pursuant to this section or s. 553.8425. Any person who 319 advertises, sells, offers, provides, distributes, or markets a 320 product as hurricane, windstorm, or impact protection from wind 321 borne debris without such approval is subject to the Florida 322 Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices Act under part II of 323 chapter 501 brought by the enforcing authority as defined in s. 324 501.203. 325 (a)âProducts for which the code establishes standardized 326 testing or comparative or rational analysis methods shall be 327 approved by submittal and validation of one of the following 328 reports or listings indicating that the product or method or 329 system of construction was in compliance with the Florida 330 Building Code and that the product or method or system of 331 construction is, for the purpose intended, at least equivalent 332 to that required by the Florida Building Code: 333 1.âA certification mark or listing of an approved 334 certification agency, which may be used only for products for 335 which the code designates standardized testing; 336 2.âA test report from an approved testing laboratory; 337 3.âA product evaluation report based upon testing or 338 comparative or rational analysis, or a combination thereof, from 339 an approved product evaluation entity; or 340 4.âA product evaluation report based upon testing or 341 comparative or rational analysis, or a combination thereof, 342 developed and signed and sealed by a professional engineer or 343 architect, licensed in this state. 344 345 A product evaluation report or a certification mark or listing 346 of an approved certification agency which demonstrates that the 347 product or method or system of construction complies with the 348 Florida Building Code for the purpose intended is equivalent to 349 a test report and test procedure referenced in the Florida 350 Building Code. An application for state approval of a product 351 under subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 3. must be approved by the 352 department after the commission staff or a designee verifies 353 that the application and related documentation are complete. 354 This verification must be completed within 10 business days 355 after receipt of the application. Upon approval by the 356 department, the product shall be immediately added to the list 357 of state-approved products maintained under subsection (13). 358 Approvals by the department shall be reviewed and ratified by 359 the commissionâs program oversight committee except for a 360 showing of good cause that a review by the full commission is 361 necessary. The commission shall adopt rules providing means to 362 cure deficiencies identified within submittals for products 363 approved under this paragraph. 364 (b)âProducts, methods, or systems of construction for which 365 there are no specific standardized testing or comparative or 366 rational analysis methods established in the code may be 367 approved by submittal and validation of one of the following: 368 1.âA product evaluation report based upon testing or 369 comparative or rational analysis, or a combination thereof, from 370 an approved product evaluation entity indicating that the 371 product or method or system of construction was in compliance 372 with the intent of the Florida Building Code and that the 373 product or method or system of construction is, for the purpose 374 intended, at least equivalent to that required by the Florida 375 Building Code; or 376 2.âA product evaluation report based upon testing or 377 comparative or rational analysis, or a combination thereof, 378 developed and signed and sealed by a professional engineer or 379 architect, licensed in this state, who certifies that the 380 product or method or system of construction is, for the purpose 381 intended, at least equivalent to that required by the Florida 382 Building Code. 383 Section 8.âSection 553.8992, Florida Statutes, is created 384 to read: 385 553.8992âIncorporation of standards into the Florida 386 Building Code.âBy December 31, 2026, the Florida Building 387 Commission shall incorporate into the Florida Building Code 388 pursuant to s. 553.73(1) standards for the adoption of sections 389 680.26(B)(1) Conductive Pool Shells and 680.26(B)(2) Perimeter 390 Surfaces of the 2026 Edition of the National Electrical Code for 391 all new construction of commercial or residential pools. 392 Section 9.âSubsection (3) of section 497.271, Florida 393 Statutes, is amended to read: 394 497.271âStandards for construction and significant 395 alteration or renovation of mausoleums and columbaria.â 396 (3)âThe licensing authority shall transmit the rules as 397 adopted under subsection (2), referred to as the âmausoleum 398 standards,â to the Florida Building Commission, which shall 399 initiate rulemaking under chapter 120 to consider such mausoleum 400 standards. If such mausoleum standards are not deemed 401 acceptable, they must be returned by the Florida Building 402 Commission to the licensing authority with details of changes 403 needed to make them acceptable. If such mausoleum standards are 404 acceptable, the Florida Building Commission must adopt a rule 405 designating the mausoleum standards as an approved revision to 406 the State Minimum Building Codes under part IV of chapter 553. 407 When designated by the Florida Building Commission, such 408 mausoleum standards must shall become a required element of the 409 State Minimum Building Codes under s. 553.73(2)(a) and must 410 shall be transmitted to each local enforcement agency, as 411 defined in s. 553.71 s. 553.71(5). Such local enforcement agency 412 shall consider and inspect for compliance with such mausoleum 413 standards as if they were part of the local building code, but 414 shall have no continuing duty to inspect after final approval of 415 the construction pursuant to the local building code. Any 416 further amendments to the mausoleum standards must shall be 417 accomplished by the same procedure. Such designated mausoleum 418 standards, as from time to time amended, must shall be a part of 419 the State Minimum Building Codes under s. 553.73 until the 420 adoption and effective date of a new statewide uniform minimum 421 building code, which may supersede the mausoleum standards as 422 provided by the law enacting the new statewide uniform minimum 423 building code. 424 Section 10.âSubsection (5) of section 553.902, Florida 425 Statutes, is amended to read: 426 553.902âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 427 (5)ââLocal enforcement agencyâ means the agency of local 428 government which has the authority to make inspections of 429 buildings and to enforce the Florida Building Code. The term 430 includes any agency within the definition of s. 553.71 s. 431 553.71(5). 432 Section 11.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.